Washington statutes.
RCW 2.48.021

New members.

After the organization of the state bar, as herein provided, all persons who are admitted to practice in accordance with the provisions of RCW 2.48.010 through 2.48.180, except judges of courts of record, shall become by that fact active members of the state bar.

[ 1933 c 94 s 4; RRS s 138-4. Formerly RCW 2.48.020, part.]